California statutes. Penal Code
(e) (1) Any railroad police officer commissioned by the Governor pursuant to Section 8226 of the Public Utilities Code, if the primary duty of the peace officer is the enforcement of the law in or about properties owned, operated, or administered by the employing agency or when performing necessary duties with respect to patrons, employees, and properties of the employing agency.

(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a railroad police officer who has met the current requirements of the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training necessary for exercising the powers of a peace officer, and who has been commissioned by the Governor as described herein, and the officer’s employing agency, may apply for access to information from the California Law Enforcement Telecommunications System (CLETS) through a local law enforcement agency that has been granted direct access to CLETS, provided that, in addition to other review standards and conditions of eligibility applied by the Department of Justice, the CLETS Advisory Committee and the Attorney General, before access is granted the following are satisfied:

(A) The employing agency shall enter into a Release of CLETS Information agreement as provided for in the CLETS policies, practices, and procedures, and the required background check on the peace officer and other pertinent personnel has been completed, together with all required training.

(B) The Release of CLETS Information agreement shall be in substantially the same form as prescribed by the CLETS policies, practices, and procedures for public agencies of law enforcement who subscribe to CLETS services, and shall be subject to the provisions of Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 15150) of Title 2 of Division 3 of the Government Code and the CLETS policies, practices, and procedures.

(C) (i) The employing agency shall expressly waive any objections to jurisdiction in the courts of the State of California for any liability arising from use, abuse, or misuse of CLETS access or services or the information derived therefrom, or with respect to any legal actions to enforce provisions of California law relating to CLETS access, services, or information under this subdivision, and provided that this liability shall be in addition to that imposed by Public Utilities Code Section 8226.

(ii) The employing agency shall further agree to utilize CLETS access, services, or information only for law enforcement activities by peace officers who have met the current requirements of the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training necessary for exercising the powers of a peace officer, and who have been commissioned as described herein who are operating within the State of California, where the activities are directly related to investigations or arrests arising from conduct occurring within the State of California.

(iii) The employing agency shall further agree to pay to the Department of Justice and the providing local law enforcement agency all costs related to the provision of access or services, including, but not limited to, any and all hardware, interface modules, and costs for telephonic communications, as well as administrative costs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 510, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

830.34.

The following persons are peace officers whose authority extends to any place in the state for the purpose of performing their primary duty or when making an arrest pursuant to Section 836 as to any public offense with respect to which there is immediate danger to person or property, or of the escape of the perpetrator of that offense, or pursuant to Section 8597 or 8598 of the Government Code. Those peace officers may carry firearms only if authorized and under terms and conditions specified by their employing agency.

(a) Persons designated as a security officer by a municipal utility district pursuant to Section 12820 of the Public Utilities Code, if the primary duty of the officer is the protection of the properties of the utility district and the protection of the persons thereon.

(b) Persons designated as a security officer by a county water district pursuant to Section 30547 of the Water Code, if the primary duty of the officer is the protection of the properties of the county water district and the protection of the persons thereon.

(c) The security director of the public utilities commission of a city and county, if the primary duty of the security director is the protection of the properties of the commission and the protection of the persons thereon.

(d) Persons employed as a park ranger by a municipal water district pursuant to Section 71341.5 of the Water Code, if the primary duty of the park ranger is the protection of the properties of the municipal water district and the protection of the persons thereon.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 799, Sec. 1.   Effective September 27, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

830.35.

The following persons are peace officers whose authority extends to any place in the state for the purpose of performing their primary duty or when making an arrest pursuant to Section 836 as to any public offense with respect to which there is immediate danger to person or property, or of the escape of the perpetrator of that offense, or pursuant to Section 8597 or 8598 of the Government Code. Those peace officers may carry firearms only if authorized and under terms and conditions specified by their employing agency.

(a) A welfare fraud investigator or inspector, regularly employed and paid in that capacity by a county, if the primary duty of the peace officer is the enforcement of the provisions of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(b) A child support investigator or inspector, regularly employed and paid in that capacity by a district attorney’s office, if the primary duty of the peace officer is the enforcement of the provisions of the Family Code and Section 270.

(c) The coroner and deputy coroners, regularly employed and paid in that capacity, of a county, if the primary duty of the peace officer are those duties set forth in Sections 27469 and 27491 to 27491.4, inclusive, of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 808, Sec. 110.3.   Effective September 28, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

830.36.

The following persons are peace officers whose authority extends to any place in the state for the purpose of performing their primary duty or when making an arrest pursuant to Section 836 as to any public offense with respect to which there is immediate danger to person or property, or of the escape of the perpetrator of that offense, or pursuant to Section 8597 or 8598 of the Government Code. Those peace officers may carry firearms only if authorized and under terms and conditions specified by their employing agency.

(a) The Sergeant-at-Arms of each house of the Legislature, if the primary duty of the peace officer is the enforcement of the law in or about properties owned, operated, or administered by the employing agency or when performing necessary duties with respect to patrons, employees, and properties of the employing agency.

(b) Marshals of the Supreme Court and bailiffs of the courts of appeal, and coordinators of security for the judicial branch, if the primary duty of the peace officer is the enforcement of the law in or about properties owned, operated, or administered by the employing agency or when performing necessary duties with respect to patrons, employees, and properties of the employing agency.

(c) Court service officer in a county of the second class and third class, if the primary duty of the peace officer is the enforcement of the law in or about properties owned, operated, or administered by the employing agency or when performing necessary duties with respect to patrons, employees, and properties of the employing agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 891, Sec. 30.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

830.37.

The following persons are peace officers whose authority extends to any place in the state for the purpose of performing their primary duty or when making an arrest pursuant to Section 836 as to any public offense with respect to which there is immediate danger to person or property, or of the escape of the perpetrator of that offense, or pursuant to Section 8597 or 8598 of the Government Code. These peace officers may carry firearms only if authorized and under terms and conditions specified by their employing agency:

(a) Members of an arson-investigating unit, regularly paid and employed in that capacity, of a fire department or fire protection agency of a county, city, city and county, district, or the state, if the primary duty of these peace officers is the detection and apprehension of persons who have violated any fire law or committed insurance fraud.

(b) Members other than members of an arson-investigating unit, regularly paid and employed in that capacity, of a fire department or fire protection agency of a county, city, city and county, district, or the state, if the primary duty of these peace officers, when acting in that capacity, is the enforcement of laws relating to fire prevention or fire suppression.

(c) Voluntary fire wardens as are designated by the Director of Forestry and Fire Protection pursuant to Section 4156 of the Public Resources Code, provided that the primary duty of these peace officers shall be the enforcement of the law as that duty is set forth in Section 4156 of the Public Resources Code.

(d) Firefighter/security guards by the Military Department, if the primary duty of the peace officer is the enforcement of the law in or about properties owned, operated, or administered by the employing agency or when performing necessary duties with respect to patrons, employees, and properties of the employing agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 427, Sec. 129.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

830.38.

(a) The officers of a state hospital under the jurisdiction of the State Department of State Hospitals or the State Department of Developmental Services appointed pursuant to Section 4313 or 4493 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, are peace officers whose authority extends to any place in the state for the purpose of performing their primary duty or when making an arrest pursuant to Section 836 as to any public offense with respect to which there is immediate danger to person or property, or of the escape of the perpetrator of that offense, or pursuant to Section 8597 or 8598 of the Government Code provided that the primary duty of the peace officers shall be the enforcement of the law as set forth in Sections 4311, 4313, 4491, and 4493 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. Those peace officers may carry firearms only if
 authorized and under terms and conditions specified by their employing agency.

(b) By July 1, 2015, the California Health and Human Services Agency shall develop training protocols and policies and procedures for peace officers specified in subdivision (a). When appropriate, training protocols and policies and procedures shall be uniformly implemented in both state hospitals and developmental centers. Additional training protocols and policies and procedures shall be developed to address the unique characteristics of the residents in each type of facility.

(c) In consultation with system stakeholders, the agency shall develop recommendations to further improve the quality and stability of law enforcement and investigative functions at both developmental centers and state hospitals in a meaningful and sustainable manner. These recommendations shall be submitted to the budget
 committees and relevant policy committees of both houses of the Legislature no later than January 10, 2015.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 26, Sec. 14.   (AB 1468)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

830.39.

(a) Any regularly employed law enforcement officer of the Oregon State Police, the Nevada Department of Motor Vehicles and Public Safety, or the Arizona Department of Public Safety is a peace officer in this state if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The officer is providing, or attempting to provide, law enforcement services within this state on the state or county highways and areas immediately adjacent thereto, within a distance of up to 50 statute miles of the contiguous border of this state and the state employing the officer.

(2) The officer is providing, or attempting to provide, law enforcement services pursuant to either of the following:

(A) In response to a request for services initiated by a member of the California Highway Patrol.

(B) In response to a reasonable belief that emergency law enforcement services are necessary for the preservation of life, and a request for services by a member of the Department of the California Highway Patrol is impractical to obtain under the circumstances. In those situations, the officer shall obtain authorization as soon as practical.

(3) The officer is providing, or attempting to provide, law enforcement services for the purpose of assisting a member of the California Highway Patrol to provide emergency service in response to misdemeanor or felony criminal activity, pursuant to the authority of a peace officer as provided in subdivision (a) of Section 830.2, or, in the event of highway-related traffic accidents, emergency incidents or other similar public safety problems, whether or not a member of the California Highway Patrol is present at the scene of the event. Nothing in this section shall be construed to confer upon the officer the authority to enforce traffic or motor vehicle infractions.

(4) An agreement pursuant to Section 2403.5 of the Vehicle Code is in effect between the Department of the California Highway Patrol and the agency of the adjoining state employing the officer, the officer acts in accordance with that agreement, and the agreement specifies that the officer and employing agency of the adjoining state shall be subject to the same civil immunities and liabilities as a peace officer and his or her employing agency in this state.

(5) The officer receives no separate compensation from this state for providing law enforcement services within this state.

(6) The adjoining state employing the officer confers similar rights and authority upon a member of the California Highway Patrol who renders assistance within that state.

(b) Whenever, pursuant to Nevada law, a Nevada correctional officer is working or supervising Nevada inmates who are performing conservation-related projects or fire suppression duties within California, the correctional officer may maintain custody of the inmates in California, and retake any inmate who should escape in California, to the same extent as if the correctional officer were a peace officer in this state and the inmate had been committed to his or her custody in proceedings under California law.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any person who is acting as a peace officer in this state in the manner described in this section shall be deemed to have met the requirements of Section 1031 of the Government Code and the selection and training standards of the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training if the officer has completed the basic training required for peace officers in his or her state.

(d) In no case shall a peace officer of an adjoining state be authorized to provide services within a California jurisdiction during any period in which the regular law enforcement agency of the jurisdiction is involved in a labor dispute.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 131, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

830.4.

The following persons are peace officers whose authority extends to any place in the state for the purpose of performing their duties under the conditions as specified by statute. Those peace officers may carry firearms only if authorized and under terms and conditions specified by their employing agency.

(a) Members of the California National Guard have the powers of peace officers when they are involved in any or all of the following:

(1) Called or ordered into active state service by the Governor pursuant to the provisions of Section 143 or 146 of the Military and Veterans Code.

(2) Serving within the area wherein military assistance is required.

(3) Directly assisting civil authorities in any of the situations specified in Section 143 or 146 of the Military and Veterans Code.

The authority of the peace officer under this subdivision extends to the area wherein military assistance is required as to a public offense committed or which there is reasonable cause to believe has been committed within that area. The requirements of Section 1031 of the Government Code are not applicable under those circumstances.

(b) Security officers of the Department of Justice when performing assigned duties as security officers.

(c) Security officers of the college named in Section 92200 of the Education Code. These officers shall have authority of peace officers only within the City and County of San Francisco. Notwithstanding any other
 law, the peace officers designated by this subdivision shall not be authorized by this subdivision to carry firearms either on or off duty. Notwithstanding any other law, the act which designated the persons described in this subdivision as peace officers shall serve only to define those persons as peace officers, the extent of their jurisdiction, and the nature and scope of their authority, powers, and duties, and their status shall not change for purposes of retirement, workers’ compensation or similar injury or death benefits, or other employee benefits.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 478, Sec. 63.   (AB 1936)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

830.41.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the City of Tulelake, California, is authorized to enter into a mutual aid agreement with the City of Malin, Oregon, for the purpose of permitting their police departments to provide mutual aid to each other when necessary. Before the effective date of the agreement, the agreement shall be reviewed and approved by the Commissioner of the California Highway Patrol.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 76, Sec. 149.   (AB 383)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

830.5.

The following persons are peace officers whose authority extends to any place in the state while engaged in the performance of the duties of their respective employment and for the purpose of carrying out the primary function of their employment or as required under Sections 8597, 8598, and 8617 of the Government Code. Except as specified in this section, these peace officers may carry firearms only if authorized and under those terms and conditions specified by their employing agency:

(a) A parole officer of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, or the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Parole Operations, probation officer, deputy probation officer, or a board coordinating parole agent employed by the Juvenile Parole Board.
 Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, the authority of these parole or probation officers shall extend only as follows:

(1) To conditions of parole, probation, mandatory supervision, or postrelease community supervision by any person in this state on parole, probation, mandatory supervision, or postrelease community supervision.

(2) To the escape of any inmate or ward from a state or local institution.

(3) To the transportation of persons on parole, probation, mandatory supervision, or postrelease community supervision.

(4) To violations of any penal provisions of law which are discovered while performing the usual or authorized duties of the officer’s employment.

(5) (A) To the rendering of mutual aid to any other law enforcement agency.

(B) For the purposes of this subdivision, “parole agent” shall have the same meaning as parole officer of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation or of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Justice.

(C) Any parole officer of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, or the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Parole Operations, is authorized to carry firearms, but only as determined by the director on a case-by-case or unit-by-unit basis and only under those terms and conditions specified by the director or chairperson. The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Justice, shall develop a policy for arming peace officers of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile
 Justice, who comprise “high-risk transportation details” or “high-risk escape details” no later than June 30, 1995. This policy shall be implemented no later than December 31, 1995.

(D) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Justice, shall train and arm those peace officers who comprise tactical teams at each facility for use during “high-risk escape details.”

(b) A correctional officer employed by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, or of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Justice, having custody of wards or any employee of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation designated by the secretary or any correctional counselor series employee of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation or any medical technical assistant series employee designated by the secretary or designated by the
 secretary and employed by the State Department of State Hospitals or any employee of the Board of Parole Hearings designated by the secretary or employee of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Justice, designated by the secretary or any superintendent, supervisor, or employee having custodial responsibilities in an institution operated by a probation department, or any transportation officer of a probation department.

(c) The following persons may carry a firearm while not on duty: a parole officer of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, or the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Justice, a correctional officer or correctional counselor employed by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, or an employee of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Justice, having custody of wards or any employee of the Department of Corrections
 and Rehabilitation designated by the secretary or any medical technical assistant series employee designated by the secretary or designated by the secretary and employed by the State Department of State Hospitals. A parole officer of the Juvenile Parole Board may carry a firearm while not on duty only when so authorized by the chairperson of the board and only under the terms and conditions specified by the chairperson. Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to require licensure pursuant to Section 25400. The director or chairperson may deny, suspend, or revoke for good cause a person’s right to carry a firearm under this subdivision. That person shall, upon request, receive a hearing, as provided for in the negotiated grievance procedure between the exclusive employee representative and the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Justice, or the Juvenile Parole Board, to review the director’s or the chairperson’s decision.

(d) Persons permitted to carry firearms pursuant to this section, either on or off duty, shall meet the training requirements of Section 832 and shall qualify with the firearm at least quarterly. It is the responsibility of the individual officer or designee to maintain their eligibility to carry concealable firearms off duty. Failure to maintain quarterly qualifications by an officer or designee with any concealable firearms carried off duty shall constitute good cause to suspend or revoke that person’s right to carry firearms off duty.

(e) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall allow reasonable access to its ranges for officers and designees of either department to qualify to carry concealable firearms off duty. The time spent on the range for purposes of meeting the qualification requirements shall be the person’s own time during the person’s off-duty hours.

(f) The secretary shall promulgate regulations consistent with this section.

(g) “High-risk transportation details” and “high-risk escape details” as used in this section shall be determined by the secretary, or the secretary’s designee. The secretary, or the secretary’s designee, shall consider at least the following in determining “high-risk transportation details” and “high-risk escape details”: protection of the public, protection of officers, flight risk, and violence potential of the wards.

(h) “Transportation detail” as used in this section shall include transportation of wards outside the facility, including, but not limited to, court appearances, medical trips, and interfacility transfers.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 337, Sec. 11.   (SB 823)   Effective September 30, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

830.55.

(a) (1) As used in this section, a correctional officer is a peace officer, employed by a city, county, or city and county that operates a facility described in Section 2910.5 of this code or Section 1753.3 of the Welfare and Institutions Code or facilities operated by counties pursuant to Section 6241 or 6242 of this code under contract with the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation or the Division of Juvenile Justice within the department, who has the authority and responsibility for maintaining custody of specified state prison inmates or wards, and who performs tasks related to the operation of a detention facility used for the detention of persons who have violated parole or are awaiting parole back into the community or, upon court order, either for their own safekeeping or for the specific
 purpose of serving a sentence therein.

(2) As used in this section, a correctional officer is also a peace officer, employed by a city, county, or city and county that operates a facility described in Section 4115.55, who has the authority and responsibility for maintaining custody of inmates sentenced to or housed in that facility, and who performs tasks related to the operation of that facility.

(b) A correctional officer shall have no right to carry or possess firearms in the performance of his or her prescribed duties, except, under the direction of the superintendent of the facility, while engaged in transporting prisoners, guarding hospitalized prisoners, or suppressing riots, lynchings, escapes, or rescues in or about a detention facility established pursuant to Section 2910.5 or 4115.55 of this code or Section 1753.3 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(c) Each person described in this section as a correctional officer, within 90 days following the date of the initial assignment to that position, shall satisfactorily complete the training course specified in Section 832. In addition, each person designated as a correctional officer, within one year following the date of the initial assignment as an officer, shall have satisfactorily met the minimum selection and training standards prescribed by the Board of State and Community Corrections pursuant to Section 6035. Persons designated as correctional officers, before the expiration of the 90-day and one-year periods described in this subdivision, who have not yet completed the required training, may perform the duties of a correctional officer only while under the direct supervision of a correctional officer who has completed the training required in this section, and shall not carry or possess firearms in the performance of their prescribed
 duties.

(d) This section shall not be construed to confer any authority upon a correctional officer except while on duty.

(e) A correctional officer may use reasonable force in establishing and maintaining custody of persons delivered to him or her by a law enforcement officer, may make arrests for misdemeanors and felonies within the local detention facility pursuant to a duly issued warrant, and may make warrantless arrests pursuant to Section 836.5 only during the duration of his or her job.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 76, Sec. 150.   (AB 383)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

830.6.

(a) (1) Whenever any qualified person is deputized or appointed by the proper authority as a reserve or auxiliary sheriff or city police officer, a reserve deputy sheriff, a reserve deputy marshal, a reserve police officer of a regional park district or of a transit district, a reserve park ranger, a reserve harbor or port police officer of a county, city, or district as specified in Section 663.5 of the Harbors and Navigation Code, a reserve deputy of the Department of Fish and Game, a reserve special agent of the Department of Justice, a reserve officer of a community service district which is authorized under subdivision (h) of Section 61600 of the Government Code to maintain a police department or other police protection, a reserve officer of a school district police department under Section 35021.5 of the Education Code, a reserve officer of a community college police department under Section 72330, a reserve officer of a police protection district formed under Part 1 (commencing with Section 20000) of Division 14 of the Health and Safety Code, or a reserve housing authority patrol officer employed by a housing authority defined in subdivision (d) of Section 830.31, and is assigned specific police functions by that authority, the person is a peace officer, if the person qualifies as set forth in Section 832.6. The authority of a person designated as a peace officer pursuant to this paragraph extends only for the duration of the person’s specific assignment. A reserve park ranger or a transit, harbor, or port district reserve officer may carry firearms only if authorized by, and under those terms and conditions as are specified by, his or her employing agency.

(2) Whenever any qualified person is deputized or appointed by the proper authority as a reserve or auxiliary sheriff or city police officer, a reserve deputy sheriff, a reserve deputy marshal, a reserve park ranger, a reserve police officer of a regional park district, transit district, community college district, or school district, a reserve harbor or port police officer of a county, city, or district as specified in Section 663.5 of the Harbors and Navigation Code, a reserve officer of a community service district that is authorized under subdivision (h) of Section 61600 of the Government Code to maintain a police department or other police protection, or a reserve officer of a police protection district formed under Part 1 (commencing with Section 20000) of Division 14 of the Health and Safety Code, and is so designated by local ordinance or, if the local agency is not authorized to act by ordinance, by resolution, either individually or by class, and is assigned to the prevention and detection of crime and the general enforcement of the laws of this state by that authority, the person is a peace officer, if the person qualifies as set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 832.6. The authority of a person designated as a peace officer pursuant to this paragraph includes the full powers and duties of a peace officer as provided by Section 830.1. A transit, harbor, or port district reserve police officer, or a city or county reserve peace officer who is not provided with the powers and duties authorized by Section 830.1, has the powers and duties authorized in Section 830.33, or in the case of a reserve park ranger, the powers and duties that are authorized in Section 830.31, or in the case of a reserve housing authority patrol officer, the powers and duties that are authorized in subdivision (d) of Section 830.31, and a school district reserve police officer or a community college district reserve police officer has the powers and duties authorized in Section 830.32.

(b) Whenever any person designated by a Native American tribe recognized by the United States Secretary of the Interior is deputized or appointed by the county sheriff as a reserve or auxiliary sheriff or a reserve deputy sheriff, and is assigned to the prevention and detection of crime and the general enforcement of the laws of this state by the county sheriff, the person is a peace officer, if the person qualifies as set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 832.6. The authority of a peace officer pursuant to this subdivision includes the full powers and duties of a peace officer as provided by Section 830.1.

(c) Whenever any person is summoned to the aid of any uniformed peace officer, the summoned person is vested with the powers of a peace officer that are expressly delegated to him or her by the summoning officer or that are otherwise reasonably necessary to properly assist the officer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 118, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

830.65.

(a) Any person who is a regularly employed police officer of a city or a regularly employed deputy sheriff of a county, or a reserve peace officer of a city or county and is appointed in the manner described in paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 832.6, may be appointed as a Campaign Against Marijuana Planting emergency appointee by the Attorney General pursuant to Section 5 of Chapter 1563 of the Statutes of 1985 to assist with a specific investigation, tactical operation, or search and rescue operation. When so appointed, the person shall be a peace officer of the Department of Justice, provided that the person’s authority shall extend only for the duration of the specific assignment.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any person who is appointed as a peace officer in the manner described in this section shall be deemed to have met the requirements of Section 1031 of the Government Code and the selection and training standards of the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1482, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

830.7.

The following persons are not peace officers but may exercise the powers of arrest of a peace officer as specified in Section 836 during the course and within the scope of their employment, if they successfully complete a course in the exercise of those powers pursuant to Section 832:

(a) Persons designated by a cemetery authority pursuant to Section 8325 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) Persons regularly employed as security officers for independent institutions of higher education, recognized under subdivision (b) of Section 66010 of the Education Code, if the institution has concluded a memorandum of understanding, permitting the exercise of that authority, with the sheriff or the chief of police within whose
 jurisdiction the institution lies.

(c) Persons regularly employed as security officers for health facilities, as defined in Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, that are owned and operated by cities, counties, and cities and counties, if the facility has concluded a memorandum of understanding, permitting the exercise of that authority, with the sheriff or the chief of police within whose jurisdiction the facility lies.

(d) Employees or classes of employees of the California Department of Forestry and Fire Protection designated by the Director of Forestry and Fire Protection, provided that the primary duty of the employee shall be the enforcement of the law as that duty is set forth in Section 4156 of the Public Resources Code.

(e) Persons regularly employed as inspectors, supervisors, or security officers for
 transit districts, as defined in Section 99213 of the Public Utilities Code, if the district has concluded a memorandum of understanding permitting the exercise of that authority, with, as applicable, the sheriff, the chief of police, or the Department of the California Highway Patrol within whose jurisdiction the district lies. For the purposes of this subdivision, the exercise of peace officer authority may include the authority to remove a vehicle from a railroad right-of-way as set forth in Section 22656 of the Vehicle Code.

(f) Nonpeace officers regularly employed as county parole officers pursuant to Section 3089.

(g) Persons regularly employed as investigators by the Department of Transportation for the City of Los Angeles and designated by local ordinance as public officers, to the extent necessary to enforce laws related to public transportation, and authorized by a
 memorandum of understanding with the chief of police, permitting the exercise of that authority. For the purposes of this subdivision, “investigator” means an employee defined in Section 53075.61 of the Government Code authorized by local ordinance to enforce laws related to public transportation. Transportation investigators authorized by this section shall not be deemed “peace officers” for purposes of Sections 241 and 243.

(h) Persons regularly employed by any department of the City of Los Angeles who are designated as security officers and authorized by local ordinance to enforce laws related to the preservation of peace in or about the properties owned, controlled, operated, or administered by any department of the City of Los Angeles and authorized by a memorandum of understanding with the Chief of Police of the City of Los Angeles permitting the exercise of that authority. Security officers authorized pursuant to this subdivision shall
 not be deemed peace officers for purposes of Sections 241 and 243.

(i) Illegal dumping enforcement officers or code enforcement officers, to the extent necessary to enforce laws related to illegal waste dumping or littering, and authorized by a memorandum of understanding with, as applicable, the sheriff or chief of police within whose jurisdiction the person is employed, permitting the exercise of that authority. An “illegal dumping enforcement officer or code enforcement officer” is defined, for purposes of this section, as a person employed full time, part time, or as a volunteer after completing training prescribed by law, by a city, county, or city and county, whose duties include illegal dumping enforcement and who is designated by local ordinance as a public officer. An illegal dumping enforcement officer or code enforcement officer may also be a person who is not regularly employed by a city, county, or city and county, but who has met
 all training requirements and is directly supervised by a regularly employed illegal dumping enforcement officer or code enforcement officer conducting illegal dumping enforcement. This person shall not have the power of arrest or access to summary criminal history information pursuant to this section. No person may be appointed as an illegal dumping enforcement officer or code enforcement officer if that person is disqualified pursuant to the criteria set forth in Section 1029 of the Government Code. Persons regularly employed by a city, county, or city and county designated pursuant to this subdivision may be furnished state summary criminal history information upon a showing of compelling need pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 11105.
